Utah statutes.
47-3-301.   Access to publicly funded ranges.

A shooting range, whether indoor or outdoor, constructed with public funds and operated or controlled by the state, an institution of higher education, or a political subdivision, shall, unless specifically exempted in Section 47-3-305, be made available as provided in this section for use by any group.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session

